Hawaii statutes.
§184-7 County contributions. Any
county may donate, grant, convey, lease upon a nominal consideration or
appropriate land, money or other property for the development, improvement,
extension, operation, or maintenance of the state park system by the department
of land and natural resources as provided in this part. [L 1949, c 185, pt of
§1; RL 1955, §19-38; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §21; am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS
§184-7]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next